Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “COFA citizen” has the meaning given that term in ORS 413.611.
(b) “Dental care organization” means a prepaid managed care  health services organiza-
tion, as defined  in ORS 414.025, that provides dental care to members of a coordinated care
organization.
(c) “Income” means the modified adjusted gross income that is attributed to an individual
in determining the individual’s eligibility for the medical assistance program.
(2) The COFA Dental Program is established in the Oregon Health Authority. The pur-
pose of the program is to provide oral health care to low-income citizens of the island  na-
tions in the Compact of Free Association who are residing in Oregon.
(3) The authority shall  contract with dental care organizations throughout this state, and
with individual oral health care providers in areas of this state that are not served by dental
care organizations, to provide oral health care to COFA  citizens enrolled in the COFA Dental
Program.
(4) Enrollees in the COFA Dental Program shall receive  the types and extent of oral
health care services that the authority determines will be  provided to medical assistance
recipients in accordance with  ORS 414.065, without any corresponding copayments, deduct-
ibles or cost sharing required.
(5) An individual is eligible for the COFA Dental Program if the individual:
(a) Is a resident of Oregon;
(b) Is a COFA citizen;
(c) Has income that is less than 138 percent of the federal poverty guidelines; and
(d) Does  not qualify for Medicaid under Title XIX of the Social Security Act or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program under Title XXI of the Social Security Act.
(6) The authority  may use the application process described in ORS 411.400 for the COFA
Dental Program. The authority shall provide culturally and linguistically  appropriate assist-
ance, in person and by telephone,  to applicants for and enrollees in the program. The appli-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1538 (SB 1538-A) Page 1
cation process, forms  and notices used in the COFA Dental Program must conform to the
guidance adopted by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, in ac-
cordance with Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, regarding  the prohibition against na-
tional origin discrimination affecting persons with limited  English proficiency in federally
funded programs.
(7) The authority shall accept as verification of eligibility the  attestation of an applicant
for or enrollee in the COFA Dental Program that  the applicant or enrollee meets the re-
quirements of subsection (5) of this section.
(8) The authority shall conduct outreach as described in ORS 413.612 (4)(e) to facilitate
applications for and enrollment in the COFA Dental Program.
(9) The authority may not  disclose personally identifying information about applicants for
or enrollees in the COFA  Dental Program except to the extent necessary to conduct out-
reach under subsection (8) of this section or to comply with federal or state laws.
SECTION 2.  ORS 413.612 is amended to read:
413.612. (1) An individual is eligible for the COFA Premium Assistance Program if  the individ-
ual:
(a) Is a resident;
(b) Is a COFA citizen;
(c) Enrolls in a qualified health plan;
(d) Has income that is less than 138 percent of the federal poverty guidelines; and
(e) Qualifies for an advance premium tax credit toward the cost  of the individual’s qualified
health plan.
(2) Within the limits of  moneys in the COFA Premium Assistance Program Fund, the Oregon
Health Authority  shall pay the premium cost for a qualified health plan and the out-of-pocket costs
for the coverage provided  by the plan for an individual who meets the criteria in subsection (1) of
this section.
(3) The authority may disenroll a participant from the program if the participant:
(a) No longer meets the eligibility criteria specified in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) Fails, without good cause, to comply with procedural or documentation  requirements estab-
lished by the authority in accordance with subsection (4) of this section;
(c) Fails, without good cause, to  notify the authority of a change of address in a timely manner;
(d) Withdraws the participant’s application or requests termination of coverage; or
(e) Performs an act, practice or omission that constitutes fraud and, as a  result, an insurer
rescinds the participant’s policy for the qualified health plan.
(4) The authority shall establish:
(a) Application, enrollment and renewal processes for the COFA Premium Assistance Program;
(b) The qualified health plans that are eligible for reimbursement under the program;
(c) Procedural requirements for continued participation in the  program, including participant
documentation requirements that are necessary for the authority to administer the program;
(d) Open  enrollment periods and special enrollment periods consistent with the enrollment pe-
riods for the health insurance exchange; and
(e) A comprehensive community education and outreach campaign, working with stakeholder
and community organizations, to facilitate applications for, and enrollment in, the COFA Premium
Assistance  Program established in ORS 413.610 and the COFA  Dental Program established in
section 1 of this 2022 Act .
SECTION 3.
 ORS 413.032 is amended to read:
413.032. (1) The Oregon Health Authority is established. The authority shall:
(a) Carry out policies adopted by the Oregon Health Policy Board;
(b) Administer the Oregon Integrated  and Coordinated Health Care Delivery System established
in ORS 414.570 , the COFA Premium Assistance Program established  in ORS 413.610 and the
COFA Dental Program established in section 1 of this 2022 Act ;
(c) Administer the Oregon Prescription Drug Program;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1538 (SB 1538-A) Page 2
(d) Develop the policies  for and the provision of publicly funded medical care and medical as-
sistance in this state;
(e) Develop the policies for and the  provision of mental health treatment and treatment of ad-
dictions;
(f) Assess, promote and protect the health of the public as specified by state and federal law;
(g) Provide regular reports to the board with  respect to the performance of health services
contractors serving recipients of medical assistance, including reports of trends  in health services
and enrollee satisfaction;
(h) Guide and support, with the authorization of the board, community-centered health initiatives
designed to address critical risk factors, especially those that contribute to chronic disease;
(i) Be the state Medicaid agency for the administration  of funds from Titles XIX and XXI of the
Social Security Act and administer medical assistance under ORS chapter 414;
(j) In consultation with the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business  Services, pe-
riodically review and recommend standards and methodologies to the Legislative Assembly for:
(A) Review of administrative expenses of health insurers;
(B) Approval of rates; and
(C) Enforcement of rating rules adopted by the Department  of Consumer and Business Services;
(k) Structure reimbursement rates for  providers that serve recipients of medical assistance to
reward comprehensive management of diseases, quality  outcomes and the efficient use of resources
and to promote cost-effective procedures, services and programs including,  without limitation, pre-
ventive health, dental and  primary care services, web-based office visits, telephone consultations and
telemedicine consultations;
(L) Guide and support community three-share agreements in which an employer,  state or local
government and an individual all contribute a  portion of a premium for a community-centered health
initiative or for insurance coverage;
(m) Develop, in consultation with the Department  of Consumer and Business Services, one or
more products designed to provide more affordable options for the small group market;
(n) Implement  policies and programs to expand the skilled, diverse workforce as described in
ORS 414.018 (4); and
(o) Implement a process for collecting the health outcome and quality measure  data identified
by the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee and the Behavioral Health  Committee and report the
data to the Oregon Health Policy Board.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority is authorized to:
(a) Create  an all-claims, all-payer database to collect health care data and monitor and evaluate
health care reform in Oregon and  to provide comparative cost and quality information to consumers,
providers and purchasers of health care about  Oregon’s health care systems and health plan net-
works in order to provide comparative information to consumers.
(b) Develop uniform contracting standards for the purchase  of health care, including the fol-
lowing:
(A) Uniform quality standards and performance measures;
(B) Evidence-based guidelines for major chronic disease management  and health care services
with unexplained variations in frequency or cost;
(C) Evidence-based effectiveness guidelines for select new technologies and medical equipment;
(D) A statewide drug formulary that may be used by publicly funded health benefit plans; and
(E) Standards  that accept and consider tribal-based practices for mental health and substance
abuse prevention, counseling and treatment for persons who are  Native American or Alaska Native
as equivalent to evidence-based practices.
(3) The enumeration of duties, functions and powers in this section is not intended  to be exclu-
sive nor to limit the duties, functions and powers imposed  on or vested in the Oregon Health Au-
thority by ORS 413.006 to 413.042, 413.610 to 413.613, 415.012  to 415.430, 415.501, 741.001 to 741.540,
741.802 and 741.900 or by other statutes.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1538 (SB 1538-A) Page 3
SECTION 4.  Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for health  systems, health policy and analytics, and public
health, is increased by $314,543 for the purpose of carrying out section 1 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for  shared administrative services, is
increased by $394,949 for the purpose of carrying out section 1 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 5 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 668,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and analytics, and
public health, is increased by $808,628 for the purpose of carrying out section 1  of this 2022
Act.
Passed by Senate March 1, 2022
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1538 (SB 1538-A) Page 4